Montana, session 2025, HB617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 2-15-501, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-15-501. General duties. It is the duty of the attorney general:
(1) to prosecute or defend all causes in the supreme court:
(a) in which the state or any officer of the state in the officer's official capacity is a party; or
(b) in which the state has an interest;, subject to subsections (1)(b)(i) through (1)(b)(v).
(i) At least 10 business days prior to engaging in litigation in which the state may have an interest,
the attorney general shall produce a statement of intent to engage in litigation in the interest of the state, which
must be provided to the governor's office and the house and senate judiciary committees or, in the interim, the
law and justice interim committee, and published on the department of justice website. The statement of intent
must include:
(A) the nature and location of the proposed litigation;
(B) the nature of the state's interest;
(C) the attorney general's position on the issues; and
(D) an itemized projection of costs to the state for engaging in the litigation.
(ii) When notice of intent has been provided, the attorney general shall schedule a public hearing
with at least 5 business days' notice and provide an opportunity for comment from the public concerning the
attorney general's proposed litigation before engaging in litigation in which the state may have an interest.
(iii) The attorney general shall fully consider any written submissions and public comments when
deciding whether to proceed with litigation in the interest of the state. The attorney general's decision and a
statement responding to the written submissions and public comments made during the hearing must be posted
on the department of justice website within 5 business days of the public hearing and prior to the attorney
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 617

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 617.1
general engaging in litigation.
(iv) In a bona fide emergency in which time is of the essence or other circumstance that demands
action be taken in less than 10 days, the attorney general shall produce a statement of intent as required under
subsection (1)(b)(i) within 5 days of engaging in litigation in which the state may have an interest. In addition to
the requirements under subsections (1)(b)(i)(A) through (1)(b)(i)(D), the statement of intent must also state the
nature of the emergency or circumstance that justified engaging in the litigation prior to complying with the
notice provisions under subsection (1)(b)(i). The attorney general may only continue engaging in the litigation
after following the process outlined in subsection (1)(b) and fully considering any written submissions and public
comments.
(v) As used in this subsection (1)(b), the following definitions apply:
(A) "Attorney general" means the attorney general, any subordinates, or any agency litigation in the
department of justice.
(B) "Engaging in litigation" means filing or joining in litigation as a party, filing a brief in a pending
proceeding because of strong interest in the subject matter, or providing funding or personnel to support the
litigation.
(2) to represent the state in all bankruptcy proceedings in which the state's interest may be
affected and in other debt collection proceedings at the request of a state agency;
(3) after judgment in any of the causes referred to in subsections (1) and (2), to direct the issuing
of a process as may be necessary to carry the judgment into execution;
(4) to keep a permanent register of all cases prosecuted or defended by the attorney general.
Each case under subsection (1) must be entered into the register on commencement of the litigation and
updated within 30 days of the conclusion of litigation in the matter. The update at the conclusion of litigation
must include an itemization of costs associated with the litigation for each case, including but not limited to fees
and expenses for outside counsel and the number of hours expended in the matter by in-house counsel. The
register must be open to the inspection of the public during business hours. The attorney general shall deliver
the register to the attorney general's successor in office.
(5) to exercise supervisory powers over county attorneys in all matters pertaining to the duties of
their offices and from time to time require of them reports as to the condition of public business entrusted to
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 617

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 617.1
their charge. The supervisory powers granted to the attorney general by this subsection include the power to
order and direct county attorneys in all matters pertaining to the duties of their office. The county attorney shall,
when ordered or directed by the attorney general, promptly institute and diligently prosecute in the proper court
and in the name of the state of Montana any criminal or civil action or special proceeding.
(6) when required by the public service or directed by the governor, to assist the county attorney of
any county in the discharge of the county attorney's duties or to prosecute or defend appropriate cases in which
the state or any officer of the state in the officer's official capacity is a party or in which the state has an interest;
(7) to give an opinion in writing, without fee, to the legislature or either house of the legislature, to
any state officer, board, or commission, to any county attorney, to the city attorney of any city or town, or to the
board of county commissioners of any county of the state when required upon any question of law relating to
their respective offices. The attorney general shall give the opinion within 3 months following the date that it is
requested unless the attorney general certifies in writing to the requesting party that the question is of sufficient
complexity to require additional time. If an opinion issued by the attorney general conflicts with an opinion
issued by a city attorney, county attorney, or an attorney employed or retained by any state officer, board,
commission, or department, the attorney general's opinion is controlling unless overruled by a state district
court or the supreme court.
(8) to discharge the duties of a member of the board of examiners and state board of land
commissioners;
(9) to perform all other duties as required by law."
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 617